Hawaii statutes.
[§248-2.6] County surcharge on state
tax; disposition of proceeds. [Section repealed December 31, 2027. L
2015, c 240, §7.] (a) If adopted by county ordinance, all county
surcharges on state tax collected by the director of taxation shall be paid into
the state treasury quarterly, within ten working days after collection, and
shall be placed by the director of finance in special accounts. Out of the
revenues generated by county surcharges on state tax paid into each respective
state treasury special account, the director of finance shall deduct ten per
cent of the gross proceeds of a respective county's surcharge on state tax to
reimburse the State for the costs of assessment, collection, and disposition of
the county surcharge on state tax incurred by the State. Amounts retained
shall be general fund realizations of the State.

(b) The amounts deducted for costs of
assessment, collection, and disposition of county surcharges on state tax shall
be withheld from payment to the counties by the State out of the county
surcharges on state tax collected for the current calendar year.

(c) For the purpose of this section, the costs
of assessment, collection, and disposition of the county surcharges on state
tax shall include any and all costs, direct or indirect, that are deemed
necessary and proper to effectively administer this section and sections
237-8.6 and 238-2.6.

(d) After the deduction and withholding of the
costs under subsections (a) and (b), the director of finance shall pay the
remaining balance on [a] quarterly basis to the director of finance of each
county that has adopted a county surcharge on state tax under section 46-16.8.
The quarterly payments shall be made after the county surcharges on state tax
have been paid into the state treasury special accounts or after the
disposition of any tax appeal, as the case may be. All county surcharges on
state tax collected shall be distributed by the director of finance to the
county in which the county surcharge on state tax is generated and shall be a
general fund realization of the county, to be used for the purposes specified
in section 46-16.8 by each of the counties. [L 2005, c 247, §§5, 9]

Attorney General Opinions

Because the legislature was within its authority to retain
ten per cent of the county surcharge, even if the retained amount exceeds the
actual costs of administering the surcharge, there is no conflict within Act
247, Session Laws of Hawaii 2005, and no requirement that the State retain less
than the ten per cent specified in subsection (a). Att. Gen. Op. 15-1.

The State's retention of any funds in excess of what is
deemed necessary and proper to administer the surcharge does not violate either
the equal protection clause or the due process clause of the United States
Constitution or the Hawaii State Constitution. Att. Gen. Op. 15-1.

The ten per cent deduction of the county surcharge for the
costs of assessment, collection, and disposition of the county surcharge on
state general excise tax into the state general fund is neither
unconstitutional nor illegal. Att. Gen. Op. 15-1.

The term "shall" in "[T]he director of finance
shall deduct ten per cent of the gross proceeds" in subsection (a) is
mandatory, not directory. Att. Gen. Op. 15-1.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next